Mississippi statutes. Title 23. Elections
Subarticle D. Provision Applicable to Presidential Election.

§ 23-15-731.
General provisions.

Any presidential absentee ballots received by the registrar subsequent to the delivery of ballot boxes to the election managers and prior to the time for the closing of the polls on election day shall be retained by the registrar and shall be delivered, together with the applications of the qualified absentee elector to an election official designated to receive them. The registrar shall receive a receipt from the designated election official for all such ballots and applications delivered. The designated election officials shall, upon the canvassing of the returns, count such ballots as if delivered to the proper precincts and such ballots shall be considered valid for all purposes as if they had been actually deposited in the proper precinct ballot boxes. The appropriate election officials shall examine the affidavit of each envelope. If the officials are satisfied that the affidavit is sufficient and that the absentee voter is otherwise qualified to vote, an official shall announce the name of the voter and shall give any person present an opportunity to challenge in like manner and for the same cause as the voter could have been challenged had he presented himself personally in such precinct to vote. The ineligibility of the voter to vote by absentee ballot shall be a ground for a challenge. The officials shall consider any absentee voter challenged when a person has previously filed a written challenge of such voter’s right to vote. The election officials shall handle any such challenge in the same manner as other challenged ballots are handled, and if the challenge is not affirmed, the officials shall then open the envelope. The officials shall then open the envelope in such manner as not to destroy the affidavit printed thereon and shall deposit the ballot marked “OFFICIAL ABSENTEE BALLOT,” in a ballot box reserved for absentee ballots. The commissioners shall endorse on their pollbooks a proper notation to indicate that the absentee voter has voted in such election by absentee ballot.

HISTORY:
Derived from §23-11-15 [Codes, 1942, § 3203-105; Laws, 1972, ch. 490, § 105; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 345]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 235, eff from and after January 1, 1987.

§ 23-15-733.
Disposition of ballots received after election.

The registrar shall keep safely and unopened all official presidential absentee ballots which are received subsequent to the election. Upon receipt of such ballot, the registrar shall write the day and hour of the receipt of the ballot on its envelope. All such absentee ballots returned to the registrar shall be safely kept unopened by the registrar for the period of time required for the preservation of ballots used in the election, and shall then, without being opened, be destroyed in like manner as the used ballots of the election. Such information shall be processed through the Statewide Election Management System.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-11-7 [Codes, 1942, § 3203-105; Laws, 1972, ch. 490, § 105; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 345]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 236; Laws, 2012, ch. 471, § 5, eff September 6, 2012 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the amendment of this section).

§ 23-15-735.
Delivery of absentee ballots to voters in person.

Absentee ballots shall not be delivered in person to an absentee voter or to any other person except when an absentee voter shall have properly received an absentee ballot pursuant to Section 23-15-719.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 528, § 14, eff from and after August 16, 1993 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection to the addition of this section).